Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB588.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Prevailing Wage Co-Enforcement Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act." The act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act."Public body." As defined in section 2(4) of the 12345678910111213141516171819 Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act."Public work." As defined in section 2(5) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Worker." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "workman" in section 2(7) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.Section 3. Establishment of Prevailing Wage Co-Enforcement Program.The Prevailing Wage Co-Enforcement Program is established within the department for the purpose of training volunteers to identify violations of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.Section 4. Duties of department and program participants.(a) Authorization.--A program participant may conduct labor compliance site visits, interview workers on public work project sites and assist with audits and hearings under the direction of the department in any of the following circumstances:(1) When a public body alerts the department that problems or potential problems exist at a particular public work project site.(2) When a worker alerts the program participant of a potential violation of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(3) During routine monitoring activities, including sweeps and surveillance activities conducted by the department.(4) When a public body alerts the program participant about a potential area of interest.(b) Information exchange.--The department shall contact a program participant as the department deems necessary to 20250SB0588PN0595 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exchange relevant information for the purpose of identifying violations of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(c) Requirements.--A program participant shall comply with all of the following requirements:(1) The program participant shall attend an orientation about the program offered by the department before engaging in an act authorized under subsection (a). The department shall update the orientation under this paragraph as the department deems necessary to conform to the provisions of this act.(2) The program participant may not accept or solicit a payment for engaging in an act authorized under subsection (a) on a public work project site.(3) While on a public work project site, the program participant shall wear a department-issued identification badge above the waist that is attached to a clip, in a clear plastic holder and on a lanyard or other clearly visible device. The program participant may only use the identification badge while monitoring a public work project site or engaging in an act authorized under subsection (a).(4) Before visiting a public work project site, the program participant shall notify the secretary. Upon entering a public work project site, the program participant shall notify the superintendent or inspector at the public work project site before engaging in an act authorized under subsection (a).(5) The program participant may not disclose a determination under section 12 of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act to a worker on a public work project site.(6) The program participant shall record each interview 20250SB0588PN0595 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with a worker and each observation at a public work project site on a form prescribed by the department. No later than 48 hours after recording an interview or observation on a form under this paragraph, the program participant shall submit a copy of the form to the department. A form under this paragraph shall be considered property of the department.(7) The program participant shall provide a copy of each complaint or job start checklist received from a worker, contractor or subcontractor on a public work project site to the department within 48 hours of receipt. A copy of the complaint or job start checklist under this paragraph shall be considered property of the department.(8) While on a public work project site, the program participant may not record a video or photograph on public property without the consent of the secretary. A recorded video or photograph authorized under this paragraph shall be considered property of the department. The program participant shall submit a recorded video or photograph authorized under this paragraph to the department within 24 hours of recording the video or taking the photograph. The program participant may not copy a recorded video or photograph authorized under this paragraph without the consent of the department.(d) Entry to project sites.--The department, a department employee or a program participant shall be able to freely enter a public work project site for the purpose of engaging in an act authorized under subsection (a) and may not be unreasonably denied entry to the public work project site. While on the public work project site, the program participant may be required to check in with the public work project site 20250SB0588PN0595 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supervisor upon arrival and shall comply with all public work project site safety protocols.(e) Access to project sites.--A program participant shall have access to a public work project site for the sole purpose of engaging in an act authorized under subsection (a). If the program participant acts in a manner that would constitute a conflict of interest with a public body, including representing a party that is engaged in a legal action against the public body, the department shall remove the individual from participation in the program.Section 5. Prohibited activities of program participants.A program participant may not represent an organized labor union as prohibited under this section. If the program participant represents a labor union as prohibited under this section, the department shall remove the individual from participation in the program. The program participant may not:(1) wear labor union attire, including a jacket, sweatshirt, t-shirt, cap or hat;(2) distribute labor union literature, including a pamphlet, leaflet or meeting notice;(3) make disparaging remarks regarding a nonlabor union contractor;(4) engage in an act that can be interpreted as prolabor union, labor union promotion or badgering a nonlabor union contractor;(5) gather intelligence or documentation for labor union purposes;(6) review project data that is not associated with a pending or active complaint or investigation recognized by the department;20250SB0588PN0595 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) engage in an act associated with a project labor agreement, including requesting or gathering information regarding project funding, bid tabulation, contracts, project scope or specifications or substitution requests; or(8) hold oneself out as a public body employee to a public work site superintendent, inspector, staff, employee or consultant or member of the public.Section 6. Exclusion from program participation.The department may exclude any of the following from participation in the program:(1) An individual who acts in a manner that constitutes a conflict of interest with the department or a public body as specified under section 4(e).(2) An individual who represents an organized labor union as prohibited under section 5.Section 7. Investigation of public work project sites.(a) Determination.--(1) Within 120 days of receiving all the required documentation from a program participant under this act, the department shall conduct a review of the documentation and make a written determination on whether the program participant should institute an investigation of the public work project site.(2) If the department determines that no investigation is required, the department shall provide the reasoning for the determination.(b) Conduct of investigation.--(1) A program participant shall conduct an investigation under subsection (a) in a manner that is not subject to political influence, political intention or political 20250SB0588PN0595 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 motivation.(2) If an investigation under subsection (a) is determined by the department to be subject to political influence, political intention or political motivation after a formal hearing that allows the program participant to present evidence in the program participant's defense, the department shall bar the individual from participating in the program for up to five years.(3) If a program participant is determined by the department to have conducted more than one investigation under subsection (a) that is subject to political influence, political intention or political motivation, the department shall permanently bar the individual from participation in the program.Section 8. Regulations.The department shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the department's duties under this act, which shall include the criteria and minimum qualifications that an individual is required to meet to participate in the program.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0588PN0595 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021